tables/de-g1-core.ctb
# IE
midendword ie 346
midendword iell 24-15-123-123
always haie 125-1-24-15
always schanghai 156-1-1345-1245-125-1-24
always shanghai 234-125-1-1345-1245-125-1-24
always lakaien 123-1-13-1-24-15-1345
always tokaier 2345-135-13-1-24-15-1235
always laie 123-1-24-15
always malaie 134-1-123-1-24-15
always maien 134-1-24-15-1345
always maier 134-1-24-15-1235
always monnaie 134-135-1345-1345-1-24-15
word bien 12-24-15-1345
begword bien 12-346-1345
midendword bien 12-24-15-1345
always bienn 12-24-15-1345-1345
always skabies 234-13-1-12-24-15-234
always honigbien 125-135-1345-24-1245-12-346-1345
always mörtelbien 134-246-1235-2345-15-123-12-346-1345
always kolumbier 13-135-123-136-134-12-24-15-1235
always hosenbien 125-135-234-15-1345-12-346-1345
always wespenbien 2456-15-234-1234-15-1345-12-346-1345
always garderobier 1245-1-1235-145-15-1235-135-12-24-15-1235
always adverbi 1-145-1236-15-1235-12-24
always arbeiterbien 1-1235-12-146-2345-15-1235-12-346-1345
always feuerbien 124-126-15-1235-12-346-1345
always futterbien 124-136-2345-2345-15-1235-12-346-1345
always mauerbien 134-16-15-1235-12-346-1345
always trauerbien 2345-1235-16-15-1235-12-346-1345
always arbeitsbien 1-1235-12-146-2345-234-12-346-1345
always lesbier 123-15-234-12-24-15-1235
always trachtbien 2345-1235-1-1456-2345-12-346-1345
always nubier 1345-136-12-24-15-1235
always holzbien 125-135-123-1356-12-346-1345
always pelzbien 1234-15-123-1356-12-346-1345
#                                      cie
always ciego 14-24-15-1245-135
always ancien 1-1345-14-24-15-1345
always ancier 1-1345-14-24-15-1235
always lancier 123-1-1345-14-346-1235
always nuancier 1345-136-1-1345-14-346-1235
always avancier 1-1236-1-1345-14-346-1235
always rencier 1235-15-1345-14-24-15-1235
always concierge 14-135-1345-14-24-15-1235-1245-15
always societas 234-135-14-24-15-2345-1-234
always society 234-135-14-24-15-2345-13456
always science 234-14-24-15-1345-14-15
always sciento 234-14-24-15-1345-2345-135
always saucier 234-16-14-24-15-1235
always diego 145-24-15-1245-135
always dielektr 145-24-15-123-15-13-2345-1235
word dien 145-346-1345
midendword dien 145-24-15-1345
always diene 145-346-1345-15
always medien 134-15-145-24-15-1345
always dienlich 145-346-1345-123-24-1456
always dienst 145-346-1345-23456
always dienstag 145-346-1345-234-2345-1-1245
always dient 145-346-1345-2345
#                                      dier
word diet 145-24-15-2345
always diethyl 145-24-15-2345-125-13456-123
prfword dieu 145-24-126
always adieu 1-145-24-126
always barbadier 12-1-1235-12-1-145-24-15-1235
always brigadier 12-1235-24-1245-1-145-24-15-1235
always arkadier 1-1235-13-1-145-24-15-1235
always kanadier 13-1-1345-1-145-24-15-1235
always gradient 1245-1235-1-145-24-15-1345-2345
always bedien 12-15-145-346-1345
always gedient 1245-15-145-346-1345-2345
always expedient 15-1346-1234-15-145-24-15-1345-2345
always andien 1-1345-145-346-1345
always burundier 12-136-1235-136-1345-145-24-15-1235
always komödie 13-135-134-246-145-24-15
always tragödie 2345-1235-1-1245-246-145-24-15
always verdien 1236-15-1235-145-346-1345
always kapverdier 13-1-1234-1236-15-1235-145-24-15-1235
always studie 23456-136-145-24-15
always studier 23456-136-145-346-1235
always fierant 124-24-15-1235-1-1345-2345
always fiesta 124-24-15-234-2345-1
endword grafien 1245-1235-1-124-24-15-1345
midendword schauffier 234-1456-16-124-124-346-1235
always identifier 24-145-15-1345-2345-24-124-24-15-1235
always profierfahr 1234-1235-135-124-24-15-1235-124-1-125-1235
midendword gien 1245-24-15-1345
always gieneutral 1245-346-1345-126-2345-1235-1-123
always gieniveau 1245-346-1345-24-1236-15-16
always magier 134-1-1245-24-15-1235
always belgier 12-15-123-1245-24-15-1235
always orgie 135-1235-1245-24-15
always georgier 1245-15-135-1235-1245-24-15-1235
always hierarch 125-24-15-1235-1-1235-1456
always hierarchie 125-24-15-1235-1-1235-1456-346
always hierarchien 125-24-15-1235-1-1235-1456-24-15-1345
always hieroglyph 125-24-15-1235-135-1245-123-13456-1234-125
always hieronymus 125-24-15-1235-135-1345-13456-134-136-234
always chien 1456-24-15-1345
always alighieri 1-123-24-1245-125-24-15-1235-24
endword graphien 1245-1235-1-1234-125-24-15-1345
prfword philosophien 1234-125-24-123-135-234-135-1234-125-24-15-1345
#                                     thie
always thierry 2345-125-24-15-1235-1235-13456
always pathien 1234-1-2345-125-24-15-1345
always forsythie 124-135-1235-234-13456-2345-125-24-15
always kiellini 13-346-123-123-24-1345-24
always kiew 13-24-15-2456
always thrakien 2345-125-1235-1-13-24-15-1345
always bankier 12-1-1345-13-24-15-1235
sufword skier 234-13-24-15-1235
always abfahrtsskier 1-12-124-1-125-1235-2345-234-234-13-24-15-1235
always laufskier 123-16-124-234-13-24-15-1235
always tourenskier 2345-135-136-1235-15-1345-234-13-24-15-1235
always wasserskier 2456-1-234-234-15-1235-234-13-24-15-1235
#                                      lier
midendword lien 123-24-15-1345
always lieutenant 123-24-126-2345-15-1345-1-1345-2345
#                                     alie
always zerealie 1356-15-1235-15-1-123-24-15
always chemikalie 1456-15-134-24-13-1-123-24-15
always somalier 234-135-134-1-123-24-15-1235
always formalie 124-135-1235-134-1-123-24-15
always marginalie 134-1-1235-1245-24-1345-1-123-24-15
always lappalie 123-1-1234-1234-1-123-24-15
always aralie 1-1235-1-123-24-15
always salier 234-1-123-24-15-1235
always nasalier 1345-1-234-1-123-346-1235
always drangsalier 145-1235-1-1345-1245-234-1-123-346-1235
always repressalie 1235-15-1234-1235-15-234-234-1-123-24-15
always australier 16-23456-1235-1-123-24-15-1235
always chevalier 1456-15-1236-1-123-24-15-1235
always richelieu 1235-24-1456-15-123-24-126
always kamelie 13-1-134-15-123-24-15
always sommelier 234-135-134-134-15-123-24-15-1235
always relief 1235-15-123-24-15-124
always atelier 1-2345-15-123-24-15-1235
always hotelier 125-135-2345-15-123-24-15-1235
always dahlie 145-1-125-123-24-15
always immobili 24-134-134-135-12-24-123-24
always lilie 123-24-123-24-15
always milieu 134-24-123-24-126
always famili 124-1-134-24-123-24
always emilie 15-134-24-123-24-15
always leutemilieu 123-126-2345-15-134-24-123-24-126
always petersilie 1234-15-2345-15-1235-234-24-123-24-15
always ottilie 135-2345-2345-24-123-24-15
always gallier 1245-1-123-123-24-15-1235
always montpellier 134-135-1345-2345-1234-15-123-123-24-15-1235
always collier 14-135-123-123-24-15-1235
always kollier 13-135-123-123-24-15-1235
always protokollier 1234-1235-135-2345-135-13-135-123-123-346-1235
always gondolier 1245-135-1345-145-135-123-24-15-1235
always folie 124-135-123-24-15
always moliere 134-135-123-24-15-1235-15
midendword emolier 15-134-135-123-346-1235
always magnolie 134-1-1245-1345-135-123-24-15
always voliere 1236-135-123-24-15-1235-15
always julier 245-136-123-24-15-1235
always juliet 245-136-123-24-15-2345
always apulier 1-1234-136-123-24-15-1235
midendword mien 134-24-15-1345
always miene 134-346-1345-15
always mienerkl 134-24-15-1345-15-1235-13-123
always mesopotami 134-15-234-135-1234-135-2345-1-134-24
always prämie 1234-1235-345-134-24-15
always prämier 1234-1235-345-134-346-1235
always premier 1234-1235-15-134-24-15-1235
always krimieck 13-1235-24-134-24-15-14-13
always mumie 134-136-134-24-15
midendword nien 1345-24-15-1345
#                                      nier
always daniel 145-1-1345-24-15-123
always jordanier 245-135-1235-145-1-1345-24-15-1235
always tasmani 2345-1-234-134-1-1345-24
always spaniel 234-1234-1-1345-24-15-123
always spanier 234-1234-1-1345-24-15-1235
always geranie 1245-15-1235-1-1345-24-15
always akranier 1-13-1235-1-1345-24-15-1235
always oranier 135-1235-1-1345-24-15-1235
always turanier 2345-136-1235-1-1345-24-15-1235
always tansanier 2345-1-1345-234-1-1345-24-15-1235
always mauretanier 134-16-1235-15-2345-1-1345-24-15-1235
always kastanie 13-1-23456-1-1345-24-15
syllable ingenieur 24-1345-1245-15-1345-24-126-1235
always armenier 1-1235-134-15-1345-24-15-1235
always slowenier 234-123-135-2456-15-1345-24-15-1235
always xenie 1346-15-1345-24-15
always insignie 24-1345-234-24-1245-1345-24-15
always carabinier 14-1-1235-1-12-24-1345-24-15-1235
always robinie 1235-135-12-24-1345-24-15
always jardinier 245-1-1235-145-24-1345-24-15-1235
always sardinier 234-1-1235-145-24-1345-24-15-1235
always linie 123-24-1345-24-15
always linier 123-24-1345-346-1235
always miniechs 134-24-1345-24-15-1456-234
always minieisen 134-24-1345-24-146-234-15-1345
always pinie 1234-24-1345-24-15
always abessinier 1-12-15-234-234-24-1345-24-15-1235
always grusinier 1245-1235-136-234-24-1345-24-15-1235
always aktinie 1-13-2345-24-1345-24-15
always argentinier 1-1235-1245-15-1345-2345-24-1345-24-15-1235
prfword routinier 1235-135-136-2345-24-1345-24-15-1235
always routiniers 1235-135-136-2345-24-1345-24-15-1235-234
always gloxinie 1245-123-135-1346-24-1345-24-15
always insomnien 24-1345-234-135-134-1345-24-15-1345
always zinnie 1356-24-1345-1345-24-15
always bonbonniere 12-135-1345-12-135-1345-1345-24-15-1235-15
always saisonnier 234-1-24-234-135-1345-1345-24-15-1235
always chansonnier 1456-1-1345-234-135-1345-1345-24-15-1235
always kaledonier 13-1-123-15-145-135-1345-24-15-1235
always makedonier 134-1-13-15-145-135-1345-24-15-1235
always mazedonier 134-1-1356-15-145-135-1345-24-15-1235
always begonie 12-15-1245-135-1345-24-15
always aragonier 1-1235-1-1245-135-1345-24-15-1235
always babylonier 12-1-12-13456-123-135-1345-24-15-1235
always katalonier 13-1-2345-1-123-135-1345-24-15-1235
always slawonier 234-123-1-2456-135-1345-24-15-1235
always dernier 145-15-1235-1345-24-15-1235
always kinderniere 13-24-1345-145-15-1235-1345-346-1235-15
always rinderniere 1235-24-1345-145-15-1235-1345-346-1235-15
always spenderniere 234-1234-15-1345-145-15-1235-1345-346-1235-15
always wanderniere 2456-1-1345-145-15-1235-1345-346-1235-15
prfword hernie 125-15-1235-1345-24-15
always hernien 125-15-1235-1345-24-15-1345
always kalifornier 13-1-123-24-124-135-1235-1345-24-15-1235
always bosnier 12-135-234-1345-24-15-1235
always punier 1234-136-1345-24-15-1235
always harpunier 125-1-1235-1234-136-1345-346-1235
always petunie 1234-15-2345-136-1345-24-15
always bithynier 12-24-2345-125-13456-1345-24-15-1235
#                                      pie
word pie 1234-24-15
word pies 1234-24-15-234
always piemont 1234-24-15-134-135-1345-2345
midendword pien 1234-24-15-1345
always pieta 1234-24-15-2345-1
always pietät 1234-24-15-2345-345-2345
always pietismus 1234-24-15-2345-24-234-134-136-234
always pietist 1234-24-15-2345-24-23456
always piezo 1234-24-15-1356-135
#                                      pier
always pierre 1234-24-15-1235-1235-15
always kopier 13-135-1234-346-1235
always pierrot 1234-24-15-1235-1235-135-2345
always pietro 1234-24-15-2345-1235-135
always kneipier 13-1345-146-1234-24-15-1235
always olympier 135-123-13456-134-1234-24-15-1235
always äthiopier 345-2345-125-24-135-1234-24-15-1235
always spiell 234-1234-346-123-123
always rupie 1235-136-1234-24-15
always croupier 14-1235-135-136-1234-24-15-1235
sufword arie 1-1235-24-15
always karies 13-1-1235-24-15-234
always araukarie 1-1235-16-13-1-1235-24-15
always opernarie 135-1234-15-1235-1345-1-1235-24-15
always kanari 13-1-1345-1-1235-24
always sopranarie 234-135-1234-1235-1-1345-1-1235-24-15
always soloarie 234-135-123-135-1-1235-24-15
always parietal 1234-1-1235-24-15-2345-1-123
always tenorarie 2345-15-1345-135-1235-1-1235-24-15
always bravourarie 12-1235-1-1236-135-136-1235-1-1235-24-15
always bassarie 12-1-234-234-1-1235-24-15
always altarie 1-123-2345-1-1235-24-15
always balzarie 12-1-123-1356-1-1235-24-15
always gabriel 1245-1-12-1235-24-15-123
always materie 134-1-2345-15-1235-24-15
always arterie 1-1235-2345-15-1235-24-15
always bakterie 12-1-13-2345-15-1235-24-15
always henriette 125-15-1345-1235-24-15-2345-2345-15
always kyrie 13-13456-1235-24-15
#                                     orie
always zichorie 1356-24-1456-135-1235-24-15
always glorie 1245-123-135-1235-24-15
